South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5536.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 53 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 53-3-340.  The fourth day of April of each year is designated as "Pearl Fryar Day" in South Carolina to honor his body of work and the creative impact that he has had both on the arts and South Carolina. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----